Illinois, session 104th, HB3101.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Operations Act is amended 5by reenacting and changing Section 20 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 10/20)7    Sec. 20. Legislative Budget Oversight Commission.8    (a) The General Assembly hereby finds and declares that 9the State is confronted with an unprecedented fiscal crisis. 10In light of this crisis, and the challenges it presents for the 11budgeting process, the General Assembly hereby establishes the 12Legislative Budget Oversight Commission. The purpose of the 13Commission is: to monitor budget management actions taken by 14the Office of the Governor or Governor's Office of Management 15and Budget; to oversee the distribution and expenditure of 16federal financial relief for State and local governments 17related to the COVID-19 pandemic; and to advise and review 18planned expenditures of State and federal grants for broadband 19projects.20    (b) (Blank). At the request of the Commission, units of 21local governments and State agency directors or their 22respective designees shall report to the Commission on the 23status and distribution of federal CARES money and any other   HB3101- 2 -LRB104 11031 SPS 21113 b1federal financial relief related to the COVID-19 pandemic.2    (c) In anticipation of constantly changing and 3unpredictable economic circumstances, the Commission will 4provide a means for the Governor's Office and the General 5Assembly to maintain open communication about necessary budget 6management actions during these unprecedented times. The 7Beginning August 15, 2020, the Governor's Office of Management 8and Budget shall submit a monthly written report to the 9Commission reporting any budget management actions taken by 10the Office of the Governor, Governor's Office of Management 11and Budget, or any State agency. At the call of one of the 12co-chairs, the Governor or his or her designee shall give a 13report to the Commission and each member thereof. The report 14shall be given either in person or by telephonic or 15videoconferencing means. The report shall include:16        (1) any budget management actions taken by the Office 17    of the Governor, Governor's Office of Management and 18    Budget, or any agency or board under the Office of the 19    Governor in the prior quarter;20        (2) year-to-date general funds revenues as compared to 21    anticipated revenues;22        (3) year-to-date general funds expenditures as 23    compared to the preceding fiscal year's Fiscal Year 2021 24    budget as enacted;25        (4) (blank); and a list, by program, of the number of 26    grants awarded, the aggregate amount of such grant awards,   HB3101- 3 -LRB104 11031 SPS 21113 b1    and the aggregate amount of awards actually paid with 2    respect to all grants awarded from federal funds from the 3    Coronavirus Relief Fund in accordance with Section 5001 of 4    the federal Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security 5    (CARES) Act or from the Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery 6    Fund in accordance with Section 9901 of the federal 7    American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, which shall identify the 8    number of grants awarded, the aggregate amount of such 9    grant awards, and the aggregate amount of such awards 10    actually paid to grantees located in or serving a 11    disproportionately impacted area, as defined in the 12    program from which the grant is awarded; and13        (5) any additional items reasonably requested by the 14    Commission. 15    (c-5) (Blank). Any plans, responses to requests, letters 16of intent, application materials, or other documents prepared 17on behalf of the State describing the State's intended plan 18for distributing grants pursuant to Division F of the 19Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act must be, to the extent 20practical, provided to the Legislative Budget Oversight 21Commission for review at least 30 days prior to submission to 22the appropriate federal entity. If plans, responses to 23requests, letters of intent, application materials, or other 24documents prepared on behalf of the State describing the 25State's plan or goals for distributing grants pursuant to 26Division F of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act   HB3101- 4 -LRB104 11031 SPS 21113 b1cannot practically be given the Legislative Budget Oversight 2Commission 30 days prior to submission to the appropriate 3federal entity, the materials shall be provided to the 4Legislative Budget Oversight Commission with as much time for 5review as practical. All documents provided to the Commission 6shall be made available to the public on the General 7Assembly's website. However, the following information shall 8be redacted from any documents made available to the public: 9(i) information specifically prohibited from disclosure by 10federal or State law or federal or State rules and 11regulations; (ii) trade secrets; (iii) security sensitive 12information; and (iv) proprietary, privileged, or confidential 13commercial or financial information from a privately held 14person or business which, if disclosed, would cause 15competitive harm. Members of the public and interested parties 16may submit written comments to the Commission for 17consideration. Prior to the State's submission to the 18appropriate federal entity pursuant to this subsection, the 19Commission shall conduct at least one public hearing during 20which members of the public and other interested parties may 21file written comments with and offer testimony before the 22Commission. After completing its review and consideration of 23any such testimony offered and written public comments 24received, the Commission shall submit its written comments and 25suggestions to the Governor or designated State entity 26responsible for administering the grant programs under   HB3101- 5 -LRB104 11031 SPS 21113 b1Division F of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act on 2behalf of the State. The Governor, or designated State entity 3responsible for administering the grant programs pursuant to 4Division F of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act, must 5consider comments and suggestions provided by the members of 6the Legislative Budget Oversight Commission and members of the 7public.8    (c-10) (Blank). At the request of the Commission, the 9Governor or the designated State entity responsible for 10administering programs under Division F of the Infrastructure 11Investment and Jobs Act on behalf of the State must report on 12the grants issued by the State pursuant to the programs under 13Division F of the Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act. 14    (d) The Legislative Budget Oversight Commission shall 15consist of the following members:16        (1) 7 members of the House of Representatives 17    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;18        (2) 7 members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 19    President;20        (3) 4 members of the House of Representatives 21    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 22    Representatives; and23        (4) 4 members of the Senate appointed by the Senate 24    Minority Leader.25    (e) The Speaker of the House of Representatives and the 26Senate President shall each appoint one member of the   HB3101- 6 -LRB104 11031 SPS 21113 b1Commission to serve as a co-chair. The members of the 2Commission shall serve without compensation.3    (f) As used in this Section:4    "Budget management action" means any fund transfer 5directed by the Governor or the Governor's Office of 6Management and Budget, designation of appropriation lines as 7reserve, or any other discretionary action taken with regard 8to the budget as enacted;9    "State agency" means all officers, boards, commissions, 10departments, and agencies created by the Constitution, by law, 11by Executive Order, or by order of the Governor in the 12Executive Branch, other than the Offices of the Attorney 13General, Secretary of State, Comptroller, or Treasurer.14    (g) (Blank). This Section is repealed July 1, 2024.15    (h) This Section shall be deemed to have been in 16continuous effect since July 1, 2024 and it shall continue to 17be in effect henceforward until it is otherwise lawfully 18repealed. All actions taken in reliance on or pursuant to this 19Section by any person or entity is hereby validated.20(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 21103-8, eff. 6-7-23.) 22    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 23becoming law.